District of Columbia statutes.
42-3228

Lease held by an infant or person with a mental disability — Renewed lease valid.

Every such surrender, and such lease or leases granted thereupon, shall be, and be deemed as valid and legal, to all intents and purposes, as if such surrender had been made by and on the behalf of a person of full age, or sane mind.

History

29 Geo. 2, ch. 31, § 4, 1756
Kilty’s Rep. 253
Alex. Br. Stat. 790
Comp. Stat. D.C., 336, § 73
Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-305, § 64(g), 53 DCR 6198

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-1428.
1973 Ed., § 45-930.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-305 rewrote the section heading, which formerly read: “Lease held by infant or mentally handicapped—Renewed lease valid”.